Maine, session 132, LD1242.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §954, first ¶, as amended by PL 2011, c. 613, §25 and affected
by §29, is further amended to read:
The department is authorized to construct along state and state aid highways roadside
picnic areas, roadside springs, scenic turnouts or other landscaping where in the opinion of
the department it may seem advisable and place distinguishing signs upon the same. The
department is authorized to use for the maintenance of the same such funds as are now
available for maintenance of state and state aid highways. In any roadside area along any
state or state aid highway where modern flush toilet facilities are provided for public use,
there must be provided toilet rooms that are accessible to and usable by the physically
disabled a person with a physical disability, as set out in Title 5, chapter 337, subchapter 5.
The department shall erect and maintain signs along the approach to any roadside area
where toilet facilities accessible to the disabled a person with a physical disability are
available that are designed to inform disabled persons a person with a physical disability
that the facilities are available. For each picnic area, the department shall enter into a lease
at no cost with a person to install and operate, where feasible, one or more solar-powered
electric vehicle charging stations at the picnic area. The person may sell to a 3rd party
excess power generated by the solar power infrastructure not required to power a charging
station.
Sec. 2. 36 MRSA §1822 is enacted to read:
§1822. Solar carport canopies
1. Solar carport canopies. Beginning January 1, 2026, a person that constructs or
has constructed a solar carport canopy that houses at least 2 electric vehicle charging
stations may amortize the payment of the tax imposed by this Part on materials and
equipment purchased to construct the solar carport canopy and any electric vehicle
charging station under the solar carport canopy annually over a period of 10 years. For
purposes of this section, "solar carport canopy" means a structure supporting a roof or
canopy on which is installed one or more solar panels or other solar power infrastructure
designed to generate electricity and under which is installed electric vehicle charging
station infrastructure to charge an electric vehicle parked under the roof or canopy.
2. Rules. The bureau may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section. Rules
adopted pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules under Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.